Utah statutes.
16-10a-1320.   Notice of dissenters' rights.
(1)  If a proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under Section
16-10a-1302 is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, the meeting
notice shall be sent to all shareholders of the corporation as of the
applicable record date, whether or not they are entitled to vote at the
meeting.  The notice shall state that shareholders are or may be entitled to
assert dissenters' rights under this part.  The notice shall be accompanied by
a copy of this part and the materials, if any, that under this chapter are
required to be given the shareholders entitled to vote on the proposed action
at the meeting.  Failure to give notice as required by this subsection does
not affect any action taken at the shareholders' meeting for which the notice
was to have been given.
(2)  If a proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under Section
16-10a-1302 is authorized without a meeting of shareholders pursuant to
Section 16-10a-704, any written or oral solicitation of a shareholder to
execute a written consent to the action contemplated by Section 16-10a-704
shall be accompanied or preceded by a written notice stating that shareholders
are or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this part, by a copy
of this part, and by the materials, if any, that under this chapter would have
been required to be given to shareholders entitled to vote on the proposed
action if the proposed action were submitted to a vote at a shareholders'
meeting.  Failure to give written notice as provided by this subsection does
not affect any action taken pursuant to Section 16-10a-704 for which the
notice was to have been given.
